Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201660-464
Commercial driver's license, defined.

Commercial driver's license means an
operator's license issued in accordance with the requirements of the Motor
Vehicle Operator's License Act to an individual which authorizes such individual
to operate a class of commercial
motor vehicle.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 14;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 5.